Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB1298.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 4702(g) of Title 75 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding paragraphs and the section is amended by adding a subsection to read:§ 4702. Requirement for periodic inspection of vehicles.* * *(g) Exceptions.--The following are exceptions to subsection (f):* * *(5) Emission inspection criteria for newest model year vehicles.--A subject vehicle shall be exempt from the requirements for emission inspection for five years after the <--<--<--1234567891011121314151617181920 vehicle is manufactured. A one-time certificate of exemption shall be affixed to the subject vehicle for the entire duration of the exemption and in a manner prescribed by department regulation. After the fifth year, the subject vehicle shall receive an emission inspection in accordance with this section. The following shall apply:(i) The department shall notify each official inspection station on a periodic basis of vehicles exempt from the requirements for emission inspection.(ii) This paragraph shall not apply if, and to the extent that, the Federal Government officially and formally notifies the Commonwealth that Federal funding would be withheld due to the exemption under this paragraph. Notice of nonapplicability under this subparagraph shall be transmitted by the department to the Legislative Reference Bureau for publication in the next available issue of the Pennsylvania Bulletin.(6) Gas cap test not required for certain vehicles.--A subject vehicle that was manufactured without a gas cap shall not be required to receive a gas cap test to determine whether the subject vehicle's gas cap is functioning as designed.(h) Antitampering inspection.--Notwithstanding subsection (g)(5), the five most recent model year vehicles shall be subject to visual antitampering inspections for the presence of emissions control components installed on the vehicle by manufacturers, which may occur during the annual safety inspection.Section 2. Section 4706 of Title 75 is amended by adding a subsection to read:20260SB1298PN1695 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 § 4706. Prohibition on expenditures for emission inspection program.* * *(h.1) Revised State implementation plan.--(1) No later than 60 days after the effective date of this paragraph, the Department of Environmental Protection shall initiate the process of removing the following counties from the enhanced vehicle emission inspection and maintenance program:(i) A county of the third class with a population between 215,000 and 216,000 based on the most recent Federal decennial census.(ii) A county of the third class with a population between 325,000 and 326,000 based on the most recent Federal decennial census.(iii) A county of the third class with a population between 354,000 and 355,000 based on the most recent Federal decennial census.(iv) A county of the fourth class with a population between 133,000 and 134,000 based on the most recent Federal decennial census.(v) A county of the fifth class with a population between 122,000 and 123,000 based on the most recent Federal decennial census.(vi) A county of the fifth class with a population between 114,000 and 115,000 based on the most recent Federal decennial census.(vii) A county of the fifth class with a population between 110,000 and 111,000 based on the most recent Federal decennial census.20260SB1298PN1695 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (2) For a county that is not removed from the enhanced vehicle emission inspection and maintenance program through the process initiated under paragraph (1) and prior to the effective date of this paragraph was subject to the enhanced vehicle emission inspection and maintenance program, the Department of Environmental Protection shall initiate the process of removing the county from the enhanced vehicle emission inspection and maintenance program if the Department of Environmental Protection can demonstrate that the county can maintain the relevant standards without benefit of the emissions reductions attributable to the vehicle emission inspection and maintenance program.(3) The revised State implementation plan shall be completed and submitted to the United States Environmental Protection Agency no later than August 1, 2026, and shall demonstrate that the counties listed under paragraph (1) can maintain the relevant standards without benefit of the emissions reductions attributable to the vehicle emission inspection and maintenance program.(4) In addition to the revised State implementation plan submitted under paragraph (3), the Department of Environmental Protection shall complete and submit a revised State implementation plan no later than 180 days after initiating the process under paragraph (2).(5) The Department of Environmental Protection shall comply with Federal law during the process of the revisions under this subsection, including by ensuring that the revisions will not interfere with attainment requirements or reasonable further progress toward attainment, and that Federal funding is not negatively impacted as a result of the 20260SB1298PN1695 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 revisions. For the purposes of this paragraph, a negative impact to Federal funding refers to the extent that the Federal Government officially and formally notifies the Commonwealth that Federal funding would be withheld due to the revisions.(6) The Department of Environmental Protection shall notify the following of its submission of the revised State implementation plan, as required to be submitted under this subsection, to the United States Environmental Protection Agency:(i) The chairperson and minority chairperson of the Environmental Resources and Energy Committee of the Senate.(ii) The chairperson and minority chairperson of the Environmental And Natural Resource Protection Committee of the House of Representatives.(iii) The chairperson and minority chairperson of the Transportation Committee of the Senate.(iv) The chairperson and minority chairperson of the Transportation Committee of the House of Representatives.(7) Upon approval by the United States Environmental Protection Agency of a revised State implementation plan, the Secretary of Environmental Protection shall transmit notice of the approval to the Legislative Reference Bureau for publication in the next available issue of the Pennsylvania Bulletin.* * *Section 3. This act shall take effect immediately.SECTION 1. SECTION 4706 OF TITLE 75 OF THE PENNSYLVANIA CONSOLIDATED STATUTES IS AMENDED BY ADDING A SUBSECTION TO READ:20260SB1298PN1695 - 5 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 § 4706. PROHIBITION ON EXPENDITURES FOR EMISSION INSPECTION PROGRAM.* * *(H.1) REVISED STATE IMPLEMENTATION PLAN.--(1) NO LATER THAN 60 DAYS AFTER THE EFFECTIVE DATE OF THIS PARAGRAPH, THE DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL PROTECTION SHALL INITIATE THE PROCESS OF REMOVING THE COUNTIES THAT WERE SUBJECTED TO THE ENHANCED VEHICLE EMISSION INSPECTION AND MAINTENANCE PROGRAM ON MAY 1, 2026, FROM THE ENHANCED VEHICLE EMISSION INSPECTION AND MAINTENANCE PROGRAM.(2) THE REVISED STATE IMPLEMENTATION PLAN SHALL BE COMPLETED AND SUBMITTED TO THE UNITED STATES ENVIRONMENTAL PROTECTION AGENCY NO LATER THAN AUGUST 1, 2026, AND SHALL DEMONSTRATE THAT THE COUNTIES REMOVED UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) CAN MAINTAIN THE RELEVANT STANDARDS WITHOUT BENEFIT OF THE EMISSIONS REDUCTIONS ATTRIBUTABLE TO THE VEHICLE EMISSION INSPECTION AND MAINTENANCE PROGRAM.(3) IF THE UNITED STATES ENVIRONMENTAL PROTECTION AGENCY INDICATES BY OFFICIAL AND FORMAL NOTICE THAT THE INCLUSION OF A COUNTY TO BE REMOVED UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) WILL RESULT IN THE DENIAL OF THE REVISED STATE IMPLEMENTATION PLAN OR RESULT IN THE LOSS OF FEDERAL FUNDING, THE DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL PROTECTION MAY PROCEED WITH REVISIONS OF THE STATE IMPLEMENTATION PLAN THAT WILL RESULT IN APPROVAL BY THE UNITED STATES ENVIRONMENTAL PROTECTION AGENCY.(4) IF A COUNTY IS NOT REMOVED FROM THE PROGRAM DUE TO THE PROVISIONS OF PARAGRAPH (3), THE DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL PROTECTION SHALL, NO LESS THAN BIANNUALLY, SUBMIT REVISIONS OF THE STATE IMPLEMENTATION PLAN TO REMOVE ANY COUNTY THAT WAS TO BE REMOVED UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) AND WAS 20260SB1298PN1695 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 NOT REMOVED AS A RESULT OF PARAGRAPH (3). THIS PARAGRAPH SHALL EXPIRE UPON TRANSMISSION OF NOTICE BY THE DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL PROTECTION TO THE LEGISLATIVE REFERENCE BUREAU FOR PUBLICATION IN THE NEXT AVAILABLE ISSUE OF THE PENNSYLVANIA BULLETIN THAT ALL COUNTIES THAT WERE REQUIRED TO BE REMOVED FROM THE PROGRAM UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) HAVE BEEN REMOVED FROM THE PROGRAM.(5) THE DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL PROTECTION SHALL NOTIFY THE FOLLOWING OF ITS SUBMISSION OF THE REVISED STATE IMPLEMENTATION PLAN, AS REQUIRED TO BE SUBMITTED UNDER THIS SUBSECTION, TO THE UNITED STATES ENVIRONMENTAL PROTECTION AGENCY:(I) THE CHAIRPERSON AND MINORITY CHAIRPERSON OF THE ENVIRONMENTAL RESOURCES AND ENERGY COMMITTEE OF THE SENATE.(II) THE CHAIRPERSON AND MINORITY CHAIRPERSON OF THE ENVIRONMENTAL AND NATURAL RESOURCE PROTECTION COMMITTEE OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES.(III) THE CHAIRPERSON AND MINORITY CHAIRPERSON OF THE TRANSPORTATION COMMITTEE OF THE SENATE.(IV) THE CHAIRPERSON AND MINORITY CHAIRPERSON OF THE TRANSPORTATION COMMITTEE OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES.(6) UPON APPROVAL BY THE UNITED STATES ENVIRONMENTAL PROTECTION AGENCY OF A REVISED STATE IMPLEMENTATION PLAN, THE SECRETARY OF ENVIRONMENTAL PROTECTION SHALL TRANSMIT NOTICE OF THE APPROVAL TO THE LEGISLATIVE REFERENCE BUREAU FOR PUBLICATION IN THE NEXT AVAILABLE ISSUE OF THE PENNSYLVANIA BULLETIN.(7) THE DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL PROTECTION MAY NOT EXPAND THE ENHANCED VEHICLE EMISSION INSPECTION AND 20260SB1298PN1695 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 MAINTENANCE PROGRAM TO ADD ADDITIONAL COUNTIES THAT WERE NOT SUBJECT TO THE PROGRAM ON MAY 1, 2026.* * *SECTION 2. THIS ACT SHALL TAKE EFFECT IMMEDIATELY.20260SB1298PN1695 - 8 - 1234